Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-262
Shareholders' list for meeting.

(MBCA 7.20) (a) After fixing
a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list
of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to notice of a shareholders'
meeting. If the board of directors fixes a different record date under subsection
(e) of section 21-259 to determine the shareholders entitled to vote at the
meeting, a corporation also shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names
of all its shareholders who are entitled to vote at the meeting. A list must
be arranged by voting group, and within each voting group by class or series
of shares, and show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder.

(b) The shareholders' list
for notice must be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning
two business days after notice of the meeting is given for which the list
was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation's principal
office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the
meeting will be held. A shareholders' list for voting must be similarly available
for inspection promptly after the record date for voting. A shareholder, or
the shareholder's agent or attorney, is entitled upon written demand to inspect
and, subject to the requirements of subsection (c) of section 21-2,222, to
copy a list, during regular business hours and at the shareholder's expense,
during the period it is available for inspection.

(c) The corporation shall make the
list of shareholders entitled to vote available at the meeting, and any shareholder,
or the shareholder's agent or attorney, is entitled to inspect the list at
any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

(d) If the corporation refuses to allow
a shareholder, or the shareholder's agent or attorney, to inspect a shareholders'
list before or at the meeting or copy a list as permitted by subsection (b)
of this section, the district court of the county where a corporation's principal
office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located, on application
of the shareholder, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation's
expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until
the inspection or copying is complete.

(e) Refusal or failure to prepare or make available
the shareholders' list does not affect the validity of action taken at the
meeting.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 62.